Maine, session 132, LD2141.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 38 MRSA §3119, sub-§1, as amended by PL 2025, c. 241, §18, is further
amended by enacting at the end a new first blocked paragraph to read:
An initiator of deposit that fails to report annually to the department in accordance with the
requirements of this subsection commits a violation of this chapter, is subject to penalties
under section 3111 and, as long as the violation exists, is prohibited from selling or
distributing in the State any beverage container subject to the requirements of this chapter.
A distributor or dealer may not sell or distribute in the State any such containers of the
initiator, and the department may remove from sale any such containers of the initiator.
Page 1 - 132LR2854(05)